Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1988
Loans to or guaranties for directors and officers.

(a) A corporation may not lend money to or guaranty the obligation of a director or officer of the corporation.

(b) The fact that a loan or guaranty is made in violation of this section does not affect the borrower's liability on the loan.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 88.